California, session 20252026, AB2248.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48980.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:48980.6. (a) (1) At the beginning of the first semester or quarter of the regular school term, a local educational agency shall notify the parents or guardians of pupils admitted to, or advancing to, grades 7 to 12, inclusive, of any both of the following:(A) Any dual enrollment or International Baccalaureate courses offered by the local educational agency.(B) The benefits of the California College Guidance Initiative, authorized pursuant to Section 60900.5, and encouragement to create parent accounts.(2) School districts shall provide the notice as part of the annual notification required pursuant to Section 48980.(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 51229.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:51229.5.(a)(1)The governing board of each school district and the governing body of each charter school maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall ensure that all pupils in those grades, and their parents or guardians, receive, on or before October 1 of each school year, a notice of the advanced academic programs available to pupils at or through their school for that year.(2)For purposes of this section, “advanced academic programs” includes, but is not limited to, Advanced Placement (AP) courses, International Baccalaureate courses, honors courses, dual enrollment or concurrent enrollment opportunities with college institutions, such as College and Career Access Pathways dual enrollment programs, and other programs through which pupils may earn college credit or advanced standing.(b)The notice shall include all of the following:(1)A list and brief description of all advanced academic programs available on campus or by partnership.(2)The benefits of participating in advanced academic programs, in language that is clear and accessible to families, including families of pupils who are the first in their families to pursue postsecondary education. The notice shall explain how these benefits, including any available weighted grade point average credit, college credit, or other academic advantages, can support pupils in saving time and money toward a postsecondary degree.(3)The necessary steps or prerequisites to enroll in each advanced academic program, such as any required preparatory coursework or registration process.(4)Information on academic and counseling supports available to help pupils succeed in advanced academic programs, as well as information on any fee waivers or financial assistance for costs, such as AP exams.(c)The notice shall be provided in writing to the pupil and the pupil’s parents or guardians by electronic means or mail and posted on the school’s website. Each pupil shall also receive notice through at least one direct communication, such as during a counseling session, academic planning meeting, or homeroom presentation, to ensure that the pupil understands the opportunities available to them. The notice shall be provided, whenever possible, in the five most spoken languages in the school district to ensure access to limited-English-proficient families.(d)Each school shall annually hold at least one informational session for parents and guardians about options for advanced academic programs and their enrollment processes and shall make reasonable efforts to notify all parents and guardians of the date, time, and location of the session. Attendance at an informational session shall be voluntary.(e)The Superintendent shall issue guidelines to facilitate implementation of this section, which may include a sample notice template and best practices for encouraging participation by pupils underrepresented in advanced academic programs.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.